North Carolina, session 2025, HB734.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Article 56 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is recodified as
Article 9 of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes as follows:

Former G.S. Citation New G.S. Citation
G.S. 14-423 G.S. 75-151
G.S. 14-424 G.S. 75-153
G.S. 14-425 G.S. 75-154
G.S. 14-426 G.S. 75-155
SECTION 1.(b) Article 9 of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes, as created by
subsection (a) of this section, reads as rewritten:
"Article 9.
"Debt Adjusting.Adjusting and Debt Settlement Prohibited.
"§ 75-151. Definitions.
As used in this Article, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Debt adjuster" means a person who engages in, attempts to engage in, or
offers to engage in the practice or business of debt adjusting.
(1) Affiliate. – Any person that controls, is controlled by, or is under common
control with any other person.
(2) "Debt adjusting" means entering Debt adjusting. – Entering into or making a
contract, express or implied, with a particular debtor whereby the debtor
agrees to pay a certain amount of money periodically to the person engaged
in the debt adjusting business and that person, for consideration, agrees to
distribute, or distributes the same among certain specified one or more
creditors in accordance with a plan agreed upon. Debt adjusting includes the
business or practice of any person who holds himself out as acting or offering
or attempting to act for consideration as an intermediary between a debtor and
*H734-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
his creditors for the purpose of settling, compounding, or in any way altering
the terms of payment of any debt of a debtor, and to that end receives money
or other property from the debtor, or on behalf of the debtor, for the payment
to, or distribution among, the creditors of the debtor.
(3) Debt adjusting also includes the business or practice of debt settlement or
foreclosure assistance whereby Debt settlement. – The business whereby any
person holds himself or herself themselves out as acting for consideration as
an intermediary between a debtor and one or more of the debtor's creditors for
the purpose of reducing, settling, or altering the terms of the payment of any
debt of the debtor, whether or not the person distributes the debtor's funds or
property among the creditors, and receives a fee or other consideration for
reducing, settling, or altering the terms of the payment of the debt in advance
of the debt settlement having been completed or in advance of all the services
agreed to having been rendered in full.debtor.
(3)(4) "Debtor" means an Debtor. – An individual who resides in North Carolina,
and includes two or more individuals who are jointly and severally, or jointly
or severally, indebted to a creditor or creditors.
(3a) "Nominal consideration" means a fee or a contribution to cover the cost of
administering a debt management plan not to exceed forty dollars ($40.00) for
origination or setup of the debt management plan and ten percent (10%) of the
monthly payment disbursed under the debt management plan, not to exceed
forty dollars ($40.00) per month.
(4)(5) "Person" means an Person. – An individual, firm, partnership, limited
partnership, corporation, or association.association, or other entity.
"§ 75-152. Debt adjusting and debt settlement prohibited.
No person, directly or through affiliates, shall engage in, offer to engage in, or attempt to
engage in debt adjusting or debt settlement.
"§ 75-153. Engaging, etc., in business of debt adjusting Debt adjusting and debt settlement
a misdemeanor.
If any Any person shall engage that engages in, or offer offers to engage in, or attempt to,
attempts to engage in the business or practice of debt adjusting, or if any person shall hereafter
act, offer to act, or attempt to act as a debt adjuster, he shall be adjusting or debt settlement is
guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor.
"§ 75-154. Enjoining practice of debt adjusting; appointment of receiver for money and
property employed.Jurisdiction of the superior court to enjoin debt adjusting or
debt settlement.
(a) The superior court shall have has jurisdiction, in an action brought in the name of the
State by the Attorney General or the district attorney of the prosecutorial district as defined in
G.S. 7A-60, to enjoin, as an unfair or deceptive trade practice, the continuation of any debt
adjusting or debt settlement business or the offering of any debt adjusting services. or debt
settlement services in violation of this Article.
(b) The Attorney General or the district attorney who brings an action under this section
may appoint a receiver for the property and money employed in the transaction of business by
such the person as a debt adjuster, to ensure, so far as may be possible, the return to debtors of
so much of their money and property as has been received by the debt adjuster, and has not been
paid to the creditors of the debtors.
(c) The court in an action under this section may also assess civil penalties under
G.S. 75-15.2 and award attorneys' fees to the State under G.S. 75-16.1.
(d) This section is in addition to any other remedies available under this Chapter or other
laws.
Page 2 House Bill 734-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 75-155. Certain persons and transactions not deemed debt adjusters or debt
adjustment.Acts authorized.
The following individuals or transactions shall persons are not be deemed debt adjusters or
as being engaged in the business or practice of debt adjusting:adjusting or debt settlement:
(1) Any person or individual who is a regular full-time employee of a debtor,
debtor and who acts as an adjuster of his with respect to an employer's debts.
(2) Any person or individual acting pursuant to any order or judgment of a court,
or a court order.
(3) Any person acting pursuant to authority conferred by any a law of this State
or of the United States.
(3)(4) Any person who that is a creditor of the debtor, or an agent of one or more
creditors of the debtor, including the creditor's agent, and whose services in
adjusting the debtor's debts are rendered that acts without cost to the
debtor.debtor with respect to debts owed to the creditor.
(4)(5) Any person who that at the request of a debtor, debtor arranges for or makes
a loan to the debtor, debtor and who, at the authorization of the debtor, acts as
an adjuster of the debtor's debts engages in debt adjusting in the disbursement
of the proceeds of the loan, loan without compensation cost to the debtor for
the services rendered in adjusting such debts.the debts, except interest and fees
authorized by law.
(5) An intermittent or casual adjustment of a debtor's debts, for compensation, by
an individual or person who is not a debt adjuster or who is not engaged in the
business or practice of debt adjusting, and who does not hold himself out as
being regularly engaged in debt adjusting.
(6) An attorney-at-law licensed to practice in this State who is not employed by a
debt adjuster.and acting within the attorney-client relationship with the debtor
or creditor, excluding services provided to a debtor by an attorney, or in the
name of an attorney, who has entered into any arrangement with a person
engaged, directly or through affiliates, in debt adjusting or debt settlement.
(7) An organization that provides credit counseling, education, and debt
management services to debtors if the organization also does all of the
following:
a. Provides individualized credit counseling and budgeting assistance to
the debtor without charge prior to the debtor's enrollment in a debt
management plan provided by the organization.
b. Determines that the debtor has the financial ability to make payments
to complete the debt management plan and that the plan is suitable for
the debtor.
c. Disburses the debtor's funds to creditors pursuant to a debt
management plan that the debtor has paid for with no more than
nominal consideration and has agreed to in writing.
d. Charges no fee or a fee to cover the cost of administering a debt
management plan not to exceed forty dollars ($40.00) for origination
or setup of the debt management plan and ten percent (10%) of the
monthly payment disbursed under the debt management plan not to
exceed forty dollars ($40.00) per month.
d.e. Provides to the debtor, periodically and on no less than a quarterly
basis, an individualized accounting for the most recent period of all of
the debtor's payments and disbursements under the debt management
plan and all charges paid by the debtor.
House Bill 734-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
e.f. Does not directly or indirectly require the debtor to purchase other
services or materials as a condition to participating in the debt
management plan.
f.g. Does not receive a payment, commission, or other benefit for referring
the debtor to a provider of services.
g.h. Is accredited Accredited by an accrediting organization that the
Commissioner of Banks approves as being independent and nationally
recognized for providing accreditation to organizations that provide
credit counseling and debt management services.
"§ 75-156. Contracts void.
Contracts for debt adjusting or debt settlement are void as against public policy.
"§ 75-157. Unfair trade practice.
A violation of this Article is an unfair trade practice under G.S. 75-1.1."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
Page 4 House Bill 734-First Edition